North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143A. State Government Reorganization.
Article 2. Department of the Secretary of State.

§ 143A-19.
Creation.

There is hereby created a Department of the Secretary of State. The head of the Department of the Secretary of State is the Secretary of State.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 4.

§ 143A-20.
Secretary of State; powers and duties.

The Secretary of State shall have such powers and duties as are conferred on him by this Chapter, delegated to him by the Governor, and conferred by the Constitution and laws of this State.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 4.

§ 143A-21.
Secretary of State; transfer of powers and duties to Department.

Except as otherwise provided in the Constitution or in this Chapter, all powers, duties and functions vested by law in the Secretary of State are transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of the Secretary of State.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 4.

§ 143A-22.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1409, s. 1.

§ 143A-23.
Notaries public; powers, duties and functions; transfer.

All of the powers, duties and functions of the Governor under

G.S. 10-1

of the General Statutes are transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of the Secretary of State.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 4.